Connecticut, session 2026, SB00290.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective from passage and applicable to acts occurring
2 before, on or after said date) Any prosecution for a violation of sections 53a-
3 70 to 53a-73a, inclusive, of the general statutes may be brought on the
4 basis of a single act or two or more acts committed over a period of time
5 as a continuous course of conduct.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage and New section
applicable to acts occurring
before, on or after said date
JUD Joint Favorable
SB290 / File No. 495 1

SB290 File No. 495
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Correction, Dept.; Judicial Dept. GF - Potential Minimal Minimal
(Probation) Cost
Resources of the General Fund GF - Potential Minimal Minimal
Revenue Gain
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which allows sexual assault prosecutions to be based on
multiple acts committed over time as a continuous course of conduct,
results in a potential cost to the Department of Correction and the
Judicial Department for incarceration or probation and a potential
revenue gain to the General Fund from fines to the extent more
individuals are found criminally liable. On average, the marginal cost
to the state for incarcerating an offender for the year is $3,3001 while the
average marginal cost for supervision in the community is less than
$6002 each year for adults and $450 each year for juveniles.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
1 Inmate marginal cost is based on increased consumables (e.g., food, clothing, water,
sewage, living supplies, etc.) This does not include a change in staffing costs or utility
expenses because these expenses would only be realized if a unit or facility opened.
2 Probation marginal cost is based on services provided by private providers and only
includes costs that increase with each additional participant. This does not include a
cost for additional supervision by a probation officer unless a new offense is
anticipated to result in enough additional offenders to require additional probation
officers.
SB290 / File No. 495 2

SB290 File No. 495
continue into the future subject to the number of offenses and fines
collected.
SB290 / File No. 495 3

SB290 File No. 495
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 290
AN ACT CLARIFYING THE MEANINGS OF "SEXUAL
INTERCOURSE" AND "SEXUAL CONTACT".